Utah statutes.
38-1a-505.   Materials for a construction project not subject to process -- Exception.

(1)  Materials provided for use in a construction project are not subject to attachment, execution, or other legal process to enforce a debt owed by the purchaser of the materials, if the materials are in good faith about to be applied to the construction, alteration, or repair of an improvement that is the subject of the construction project.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to an attachment, execution, or other legal process to enforce a debt incurred to purchase the materials described in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

